Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.065

Definitions.

As used in RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078:

(1) "Pet animal" means a tamed or domesticated animal legally retained by a person and kept as a companion. "Pet animal" does not include livestock raised for commercial purposes.

(2) "Research institution" means a facility licensed by the United States department of agriculture to use animals in biomedical or product research.

(3) "U.S.D.A. licensed dealer" means a person who is licensed or required to be licensed by the United States department of agriculture to commercially buy, receive, sell, negotiate for sale, or transport animals.

[ 2003 c 53 s 8; 1989 c 359 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.